Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
30-3135.01
Trust; marital deduction; when
provisions applicable.

Section
30-3135, as amended by Laws 2009, LB 80, applies to a trust described in subsection
(d) of section 30-3135 on and after the following dates:

(1) If the trust is not
funded as of February 27, 2009, the date of the decedent's death;

(2) If the trust is initially
funded in the calendar year beginning January 1, 2009, the date of the decedent's
death; or

(3)
If the trust is not described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, January
1, 2009.

Laws 2009, LB80, § 4.